Nevada, session 83, AB214.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388D.250 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388D.250 NRS 363A.139, 363B.119 and 388D.250 to
388D.280, inclusive, and sections 7 and 8 of this act may be cited
as the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
Sec. 2. NRS 388D.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.270 1. A scholarship organization must:
(a) Be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(b) Not own or operate any school in this State, including,
without limitation, a private school, which receives any grant money
pursuant to the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
(c) Accept donations from taxpayers and other persons and may
also solicit and accept gifts and grants.
-
*AB214*

– 3 –
(d) Not expend more than 5 percent of the total amount of
money accepted pursuant to paragraph (c) to pay its administrative
expenses.
(e) Provide grants , which must not be less than $1,000 per
pupil, on behalf of pupils [who are members of a household that has
a household income which is not more than 300 percent of the
federally designated level signifying poverty] in the order of
priority set forth in subsection 7 to allow those pupils to attend
schools in this State chosen by the parents or legal guardians of
those pupils, including, without limitation, private schools. The total
amount of a grant provided by the scholarship organization on
behalf of a pupil pursuant to this paragraph must not exceed $7,755
for Fiscal Year 2015-2016.
(f) Not limit to a single school the schools for which it provides
grants.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), not limit to
specific pupils the grants provided pursuant to that paragraph.
2. The maximum amount of a grant provided by the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 1
must be adjusted on July 1 of each year for the fiscal year beginning
that day and ending June 30 in a rounded dollar amount
corresponding to the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index (All Items) published by the United States Department of
Labor for the preceding calendar year. On May 1 of each year, the
Department of Education shall determine the amount of increase
required by this subsection, establish the adjusted amounts to take
effect on July 1 of that year and notify each scholarship organization
of the adjusted amounts. The Department of Education shall also
post the adjusted amounts on its Internet website.
3. A grant provided on behalf of a pupil pursuant to subsection
1 must be paid directly to the school chosen by the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil.
4. A scholarship organization shall provide each taxpayer and
other person who makes a donation, gift or grant of money to the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1
with an affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, which includes,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the scholarship organization satisfies the
requirements set forth in subsection 1; and
(b) The total amount of the donation, gift or grant made to the
scholarship organization.
5. Each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
provided by a scholarship organization shall maintain a record of the
academic progress of the pupil. The record must be maintained in
such a manner that the information may be aggregated and reported
-
*AB214*

– 4 –
for all such pupils if reporting is required by the regulations of the
Department of Education.
6. The Department of Education:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the contents of and
procedures for applications for grants provided pursuant to
subsection 1.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Department
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
7. A scholarship organization shall award grants on behalf of
pupils in the following order of priority:
(a) Pupils on whose behalf a grant was awarded for the
immediately preceding school year.
(b) Pupils who are the sibling of a pupil on whose behalf a
grant was awarded for the current school year or the immediately
preceding school year.
(c) Pupils who are members of a household that has a
household income which is not more than 400 percent of the
federally designated level signifying poverty.
(d) Pupils who meet one of the following criteria, in the order
in which a completed application for a grant was received on
behalf of any such pupil:
(1) A pupil who has an individualized education program;
(2) A pupil who has a parent or legal guardian who is on
active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States;
(3) A pupil who has a parent or legal guardian who is a
peace officer; or
(4) A pupil who has a parent or legal guardian who is a
firefighter.
8. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 7, a
scholarship organization shall prioritize the award of a grant to a
pupil described in subsection 7 and on whose behalf a completed
application for a grant was received on or before the deadline for
such applications over any pupil on whose behalf a completed
application was not received until after the deadline for such
applications.
9. As used in this section [, “private] :
(a) “Active duty” means full-time duty status in the active
uniformed armed service of the United States, including, without
limitation, members of the National Guard and Reserve on active
duty orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. §§ 12301-12304b and 10 U.S.C.
§ 12402.
(b) “Firefighter” means a person who is a salaried employee
of a fire-fighting agency and whose principal duties are to control,
extinguish, prevent and suppress fires. As used in this paragraph,
“fire-fighting agency” means a public fire department, fire
-
*AB214*

– 5 –
protection district or other agency of this State or political
subdivision of this State, the primary functions of which are to
control, extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(c) “Individualized education program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
(d) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
(e) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
Sec. 3. NRS 363A.139 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363A.139 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363A.130 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection , [and]
subsection 4 of NRS 363B.119 and subsection 4 of section 7 of this
act is [$6,655,000.] :
-
*AB214*

– 6 –
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $30,000,000; and
(b) For each succeeding fiscal year, an amount equal to 110
percent of the amount authorized for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in addition
to the amount of credits authorized by subsection 4 for Fiscal Years
2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the Department of Taxation
may approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1
for each of those fiscal years until the total amount of the credits
authorized by subsection 1 and approved by the Department of
Taxation pursuant to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS
363B.119 is $4,745,000. The provisions of subsection 4 do not
apply to the amount of credits authorized by this subsection and the
amount of credits authorized by this subsection must not be
considered when determining the amount of credits authorized for a
fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in Fiscal Year 2019-2020,
2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of credits authorized by
subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is less than $4,745,000, the
remaining amount of credits pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 must be carried forward and made
available for approval during subsequent fiscal years until the total
amount of credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant
to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is equal to
$14,235,000. The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant
to subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized pursuant to this subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
-
*AB214*

– 7 –
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 4. NRS 363B.119 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363B.119 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363B.110 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection , [and]
subsection 4 of NRS 363A.139 and subsection 4 of section 7 of this
act is [$6,655,000.] :
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $30,000,000; and
(b) For each succeeding fiscal year, an amount equal to 110
percent of the amount authorized for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
-
*AB214*

– 8 –
5. In addition to the amount of credits authorized by subsection
4 for Fiscal Years 2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the
Department of Taxation may approve applications for the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for each of those fiscal years until the
total amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is $4,745,000. The provisions
of subsection 4 do not apply to the amount of credits authorized by
this subsection and the amount of credits authorized by this
subsection must not be considered when determining the amount of
credits authorized for a fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in
Fiscal Year 2019-2020, 2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of
credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is less than
$4,745,000, the remaining amount of credits pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 must be carried
forward and made available for approval during subsequent fiscal
years until the total amount of credits authorized by subsection 1
and approved pursuant to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS
363A.139 is equal to $14,235,000. The amount of any credit which
is forfeited pursuant to subsection 2 must not be considered in
calculating the amount of credits authorized pursuant to this
subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 5. NRS 679A.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679A.160 Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, no
provision of this Code applies to:
1. Fraternal benefit societies, as identified in chapter 695A of
NRS, except as stated in chapter 695A of NRS.
-
*AB214*

– 9 –
2. Hospital, medical or dental service corporations, as
identified in chapter 695B of NRS, except as stated in chapter 695B
of NRS.
3. Motor clubs, as identified in chapter 696A of NRS, except as
stated in chapter 696A of NRS.
4. Bail agents, as identified in chapter 697 of NRS, except as
stated in NRS 680B.025 to 680B.039, inclusive, and sections 7 and
8 of this act and chapter 697 of NRS.
5. Risk retention groups, as identified in chapter 695E of NRS,
except as stated in chapter 695E of NRS.
6. Captive insurers, as identified in chapter 694C of NRS, with
respect to their activities as captive insurers, except as stated in
chapter 694C of NRS.
7. Health and welfare plans arising out of collective bargaining
under chapter 288 of NRS, except that the Commissioner may
review the plan to ensure that the benefits are reasonable in relation
to the premiums and that the fund is financially sound.
8. Programs established pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
315.725 and the entities administering those programs, except as
stated in NRS 315.725.
Sec. 6. Chapter 680B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 7 and 8 of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 680B.027 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to
a scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such
donation, apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the
credit authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The
Department of Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving
the application, approve or deny the application and provide the
scholarship organization notice of the decision and, if the
application is approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon
receipt of notice that the application has been approved, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the approval to
the taxpayer who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the
notice, make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization. If the taxpayer does not make the donation of money
to the scholarship organization within 30 days after receiving the
notice, the scholarship organization shall provide notice of the
-
*AB214*

– 10 –
failure to the Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits
any claim to the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order
in which the applications are received.
4. The Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year,
approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until
the amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection,
subsection 4 of NRS 363A.139 and subsection 4 of NRS 363B.119
is:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $30,000,000; and
(b) For each succeeding fiscal year, an amount equal to 110
percent of the amount authorized for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
 The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount
of the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount
approved by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2,
which must not exceed the amount of the donation made by the
taxpayer to the scholarship organization. The total amount of the
credit applied against the taxes described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the
donation.
6. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may,
after applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due,
carry the balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years
after the end of the calendar year in which the donation is made
or until the balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Scholarship organization” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388D.260.
(b) “Taxpayer” means any person liable for a tax imposed by
NRS 680B.027.
Sec. 8. 1. An insurer who makes a donation of money to a
scholarship organization during the calendar quarter for which a
report is filed pursuant to NRS 680B.032 or during a calendar
year in which a report is filed pursuant to NRS 680B.030 is
entitled, in accordance with section 7 of this act, to a credit equal
-
*AB214*

– 11 –
to the amount authorized pursuant to section 7 of this act against
any tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 680B.027.
2. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 9. NRS 680B.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680B.025 For the purposes of NRS 680B.025 to 680B.039,
inclusive [:] , and sections 7 and 8 of this act:
1. “Total income derived from direct premiums written”:
(a) Does not include premiums written or considerations
received from life insurance policies or annuity contracts issued in
connection with the funding of a pension, annuity or profit-sharing
plan qualified or exempt pursuant to sections 401, 403, 404, 408,
457 or 501 of the United States Internal Revenue Code as
renumbered from time to time.
(b) Does not include payments received by an insurer from the
Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to a contract
entered into pursuant to section 1876 of the Social Security Act, 42
U.S.C. § 1395mm.
(c) As to title insurance, consists of the total amount charged by
the company for the sale of policies of title insurance.
2. Money accepted by a life insurer pursuant to an agreement
which provides for an accumulation of money to purchase annuities
at future dates may be considered as “total income derived from
direct premiums written” either upon receipt or upon the actual
application of the money to the purchase of annuities, but any
interest credited to money accumulated while under the latter
alternative must also be included in “total income derived from
direct premiums written,” and any money taxed upon receipt,
including any interest later credited thereto, is not subject to taxation
upon the purchase of annuities. Each life insurer shall signify on its
return covering premiums for the calendar year 1971 or for the first
calendar year it transacts business in this State, whichever is later,
its election between those two alternatives. Thereafter an insurer
shall not change his or her election without the consent of the
Commissioner. Any such money taxed as “total income derived
from direct premiums written” is, in the event of withdrawal of the
money before its actual application to the purchase of annuities,
eligible to be included as “return premiums” pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 680B.030.
Sec. 10. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, and sections 7 and 8 of this act, chapter 681B of NRS,
-
*AB214*

– 12 –
NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315, inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175,
inclusive, 687B.010 to 687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140,
inclusive, 687B.150, 687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to
687B.255, inclusive, 687B.270, 687B.310 to 687B.380, inclusive,
687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and chapters 692B,
692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent applicable and not in
conflict with the express provisions of this chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 11. NRS 695F.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695F.090 1. Prepaid limited health service organizations are
subject to the provisions of this chapter and to the following
provisions, to the extent reasonably applicable:
(a) NRS 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, concerning rates and
essential insurance.
(b) NRS 687B.310 to 687B.420, inclusive, concerning
cancellation and nonrenewal of policies.
(c) NRS 687B.122 to 687B.128, inclusive, concerning
readability of policies.
(d) The requirements of NRS 679B.152.
(e) The fees imposed pursuant to NRS 449.465.
(f) NRS 686A.010 to 686A.310, inclusive, concerning trade
practices and frauds.
(g) The assessment imposed pursuant to NRS 679B.700.
(h) Chapter 683A of NRS.
(i) To the extent applicable, the provisions of NRS 689B.340 to
689B.580, inclusive, and chapter 689C of NRS relating to the
portability and availability of health insurance.
(j) NRS 689A.035, 689A.0463, 689A.410, 689A.413 and
689A.415.
(k) NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060, inclusive, and sections 7 and 8
of this act concerning premium tax, premium tax rate, annual report
and estimated quarterly tax payments. For the purposes of this
paragraph, unless the context otherwise requires that a section apply
only to insurers, any reference in those sections to “insurer” must be
replaced by a reference to “prepaid limited health service
organization.”
(l) Chapter 692C of NRS, concerning holding companies.
(m) NRS 689A.637, concerning health centers.
(n) Chapter 681B of NRS, concerning assets and liabilities.
(o) NRS 682A.400 to 682A.468, inclusive, concerning
investments.
-
*AB214*

– 13 –
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a prepaid limited health service organization is
included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 12. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB214*